Utah statutes.
31A-31-105.   Immunity.
(1) (a)  A person, insurer, or authorized agency is immune from civil action,
civil penalty, or damages when in good faith that person, insurer, or
authorized agency:
(i)  cooperates with an agency described in Subsection (1)(b);
(ii)  furnishes evidence to an agency described in Subsection (1)(b);
(iii)  provides information regarding a suspected fraudulent insurance act to
an agency described in Subsection (1)(b);
(iv)  receives information regarding a suspected fraudulent insurance act from
an agency described in Subsection (1)(b); or
(v)  submits a required report to the department under Section 31A-31-110.
(b)  An agency referred to in Subsection (1)(a) is one or more of the
following:
(i)  the department or a division of the department;
(ii)  a federal, state, or government agency established to detect and prevent
insurance fraud;
(iii)  a non-profit organization established to detect and prevent insurance
fraud; or
(iv)  an agent, employee, or designee of an agency listed in this Subsection
(1)(b).
(2)  A person, insurer, or authorized agency is immune from civil action,
civil penalty, or damages if that person, insurer, or authorized agency
complies in good faith with a court order to provide evidence or testimony
requested by an agency described in Subsection (1)(b).
(3)  This section does not abrogate or modify a common law or statutory right,
privilege, or immunity enjoyed by a person.
(4)  Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, a person, insurer,
or service provider is not immune from civil action, civil penalty or damages
under this section if that person commits the fraudulent insurance act that is
the subject of the information.
